Washington statutes.
RCW 10.21.010

Intent.

It is the intent of the legislature to enact a law for the purpose of reasonably assuring public safety in bail determination hearings and hearings pursuant to the proposed amendment to Article I, section 20 of the state Constitution set forth in House Joint Resolution No. 4220. Other provisions of law address matters relating to assuring the appearance of the defendant at trial and preventing interference with the administration of justice.

[ 2010 c 254 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—2010 c 254: "The legislature intends by this act to require an individualized determination by a judicial officer of conditions of release for persons in custody for felony. This requirement is consistent with constitutional requirements and court rules regarding the right of a detained person to a prompt determination of probable cause and judicial review of the conditions of release and the requirement that judicial determinations of bail or release be made no later than the preliminary appearance stage." [ 2010 c 254 s 1.]

Contingent effective date—2010 c 254: "Sections 1 and 2 of this act take effect January 1, 2011. Sections 3 through 10 of this act take effect January 1, 2011, only if the proposed amendment to Article I, section 20 of the state Constitution proposed in House Joint Resolution No. 4220 is validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at the next general election. If the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, sections 3 through 11 of this act are null and void in their entirety." [ 2010 c 254 s 14.] House Joint Resolution No. 4220 was approved and ratified by the voters November 2, 2010.